Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.615

Graduate fellowship trust fund program—Guidelines—Allocation system.

In consultation with eligible institutions of higher education, the office shall set guidelines for the program. These guidelines may include an allocation system based on factors which include but are not limited to: The amount of money available in the trust fund; characteristics of the institutions including the size of the faculty and student body; and the number of fellowships previously received.

Any allocation system shall be superseded by conditions in any legislative act appropriating funds for the program.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 118; 1987 c 147 s 4. Formerly RCW 28B.10.883.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.